Wisconsin, session 2025, AB136.
do enact as follows:AB136,15Section 1. 946.70 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is created to read:AB136,2,21946.70 (1) (intro.) Except as provided in sub. (2), whoever does any of the 2following is guilty of a Class I felony:AB136,23Section 2. 946.70 (1) (a), (b), (c) and (d) of the statutes are amended to read:AB136,2,64946.70 (1) (a) Except as provided in sub. (2), whoever impersonates 5Impersonates a peace officer with intent to mislead others into believing that the 6person is actually a peace officer is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.AB136,2,97(b) Except as provided in sub. (2), whoever impersonates Impersonates a fire 8fighter with intent to mislead others into believing that the person is actually a fire 9fighter is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.AB136,2,1310(c) Except as provided in sub. (2), whoever impersonates Impersonates an 11emergency medical services practitioner, as defined in s. 256.01 (5), with intent to 12mislead others into believing that the person is actually an emergency medical 13services practitioner is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.AB136,2,1714(d) Except as provided in sub. (2), whoever impersonates Impersonates an 15emergency medical responder, as defined in s. 256.01 (4p), with intent to mislead 16others into believing that the person is actually an emergency medical responder is 17guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.AB136,2,1818